Maryland, session 2026, SB0905.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–417.
– 1 –

Ch. 379 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND ADVANCED MANUFACTURING GRANT
PROGRAM.
(2) THE SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
CORPORATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO SUPPORT THE GROWTH OF
COMPANIES THAT SPECIALIZE IN REGENERATIVE MEDICINE AND OTHER ADVANCED
MANUFACTURING.
(C) THE CORPORATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND STEM
CELL RESEARCH COMMISSION, SHALL ESTABLISH:
(1) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA TO RECEIVE A GRANT UNDER THE
PROGRAM;
(2) GRANT APPLICATION PROCEDURES AND EVALUATION CRITERIA;
AND
(3) GRANT AWARD PROCESSES AND AMOUNTS.
(D) GRANT RECIPIENTS MAY USE GRANT PROCEEDS ONLY FOR:
(1) THE ACQUISITION, RENOVATION, OR CONSTRUCTION OF SPACE
FOR REGENERATIVE MEDICINE OR OTHER ADVANCED MANUFACTURING;
(2) INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT
REGENERATIVE MEDICINE OR OTHER ADVANCED MANUFACTURING; AND
(3) THE EQUIPMENT NECESSARY FOR REGENERATIVE MEDICINE OR
OTHER ADVANCED MANUFACTURING.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND ADVANCED
MANUFACTURING GRANT PROGRAM FUND.
(2) THERE IS A MARYLAND ADVANCED MANUFACTURING GRANT
PROGRAM FUND.
(3) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(4) THE CORPORATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 379
(5) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(II) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(7) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(I) GRANTS UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE COSTS INCURRED BY THE CORPORATION TO
ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(8) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(9) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) THE CORPORATION SHALL CONSULT WITH THE MARYLAND STEM CELL
RESEARCH COMMISSION ONLY ON ITEMS RELATED TO REGENERATIVE MEDICINE
UNDER THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(1) ESTABLISHING CRITERIA OR PROCEDURES SPECIFIC TO
REGENERATIVE MEDICINE UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ADOPTING REGULATIONS REGARDING REGENERATIVE MEDICINE
UNDER THIS SECTION.
– 3 –

Ch. 379 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) THE CORPORATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND STEM
CELL COMMISSION, MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND ADVANCED MANUFACTURING
GRANT PROGRAM FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –